local/apertium-sv-da/apertium-sv-da.sv.dix
    <pardef n="som/mar__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rarnas</l>
          <r>mar<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rarna</l>
          <r>mar<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rars</l>
          <r>mar<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rar</l>
          <r>mar<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>marens</l>
          <r>mar<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>maren</l>
          <r>mar<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mars</l>
          <r>mar<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mar</l>
          <r>mar<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ham/mare__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rars</l>
          <r>mare<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mares</l>
          <r>mare<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rar</l>
          <r>mare<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mare</l>
          <r>mare<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>marens</l>
          <r>mare<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>maren</l>
          <r>mare<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mares</l>
          <r>mare<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mare</l>
          <r>mare<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="num/mer__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mers</l>
          <r>mer<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rens</l>
          <r>mer<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ren</l>
          <r>mer<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mers</l>
          <r>mer<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mer</l>
          <r>mer<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rets</l>
          <r>mer<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ret</l>
          <r>mer<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mer</l>
          <r>mer<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="hum/mer__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rarnas</l>
          <r>mer<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rarna</l>
          <r>mer<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rars</l>
          <r>mer<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rar</l>
          <r>mer<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>merns</l>
          <r>mer<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mern</l>
          <r>mer<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mers</l>
          <r>mer<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mer</l>
          <r>mer<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="b/ok__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>okarnas</l>
          <r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>öckernas</l>
          <r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>okarna</l>
          <r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>öckerna</l>
          <r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>okars</l>
          <r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>öckers</l>
          <r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>okar</l>
          <r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>öcker</l>
          <r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>okens</l>
          <r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oken</l>
          <r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oks</l>
          <r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ok</l>
          <r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="morg/on__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>narnas</l>
          <r>on<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>narna</l>
          <r>on<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nars</l>
          <r>on<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nar</l>
          <r>on<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>onens</l>
          <r>on<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>onen</l>
          <r>on<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ons</l>
          <r>on<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>on</l>
          <r>on<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="bok"><i>b</i><par n="b/ok__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hammare"><i>ham</i><par n="ham/mare__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hummer"><i>hum</i><par n="hum/mer__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kammare"><i>kam</i><par n="ham/mare__n"/></e>
    <e lm="morgon"><i>morg</i><par n="morg/on__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nummer"><i>num</i><par n="num/mer__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ordbok"><i>ordb</i><par n="b/ok__n"/></e>
    <e lm="personnummer"><i>personnum</i><par n="num/mer__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sommar"><i>som</i><par n="som/mar__n"/></e>
